nb: Servisedeler inkludert: Boller; Smørskåler; Kopper; Middagstallerkner; Krus; Pepperbøsser; Salattallerken; Saltbøsser; Underfat; Serveringsskål; Serveringstallerken; Annet
fr: Vaisselle incluse: Bols; Beurriers; Verres en plastique; Assiettes plates; Mugs; Poivrière; Assiette de salade; Salière; Soucoupes; Bol de service; Plats de service; Autre
vi: Bao gồm bộ dụng cụ ăn: Bát; Đĩa đựng bơ; Cúp; Đĩa ăn tối; Cốc có tay cầm; Lọ tiêu; Đĩa salad; Lọ muối; Đĩa nhỏ đựng chén; Bát phục vụ; Khay phục vụ; Khác
de: Inbegriffenes Essgeschirr: Schüsseln; Butterdose; Tassen; Teller; Mugs; Pfefferstreuer; Salatplatte; Salzstreuer; Untertassen; Servierschale; Servierplatte; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Peças de louça incluídas: Taças; Manteigueiras; Copos; Pratos de jantar; Canecas; Pimenteiro; Prato para salada; Saleiro; Pires; Tigela de servir; Travessas; Outro
cs: Složení sady nádobí: Mísy; Miska na máslo; Šálky; Jídelní talíře; Hrníčky; Pepřenka; Salátový talíř; Solnička; Podšálky; Servírovací miska; Servírovací tác; Jiné
pt-BR: Peças de louça incluídas: Tigelas; Manteigueira; Copos; Pratos de jantar; Canecas; Frasco de pimenta; Prato de salada; Saleiro; Pires; Tigela para servir; Travessas para servir; Outro
ro-RO: Articole de veselă incluse: Boluri; Farfurie pentru unt; Cănițe; Farfurii pentru cină; Căni; Solniță de piper; Farfurie pentru salată; Solniță; Farfurioare; Bol pentru servit; Platou pentru servire; Altele
el: Τεμάχια σε σερβίτσιο φαγητού: Μπολ; Σκεύος βουτύρου; Κούπες; Πιάτα φαγητού; Κούπες; Πιπεριέρα; Πιάτο σαλάτας; Αλατιέρα; Πιατάκια; Μπολ σερβιρίσματος; Πιατέλα σερβιρίσματος; Άλλο
tr: Yemek takımı parçaları dahil: Kaseler; Tereyağı tabağı; Kupalar; Yemek tabakları; Kulplu Bardaklar; Biberlik; Salata tabağı; Tuzluk; Altlıklar; Servis kasesi; Servis tabağı; Diğer
lt-LT: Pietų servizo komponentai: Dubenėliai; Sviestinė; Puodeliai; Pietų lėkštės; Dideli puodeliai; Pipirinė; Salotinė; Druskinė; Lėkštės; Serviravimo dubuo; Serviravimo lėkštė; Kita
hu: Az étkészlet tartalmazott elemei: Tálak; Vajtartó; Csészék; Lapostányérok; Bögrék; Borsszóró; Salátás tányér; Sószóró; Csészealjak; Tálalótál; Tálalótányér; Egyéb
ko: 식기류 포함: 그릇; 버터 접시; 컵; 디너 접시; 머그잔; 후추 셰이커; 샐러드 접시; 소금 셰이커; 받침 접시; 서빙 그릇; 서빙 플래터; 기타
en: Dinnerware pieces included: Bowls; Butter dish; Cups; Dinner plates; Mugs; Pepper shaker; Salad plate; Salt shaker; Saucers; Serving bowl; Serving platter; Other
es: Piezas de vajilla incluidas: Tazones; Plato para mantequilla; Tazas; Platos de cena; Pocillos; Salero; Plato de ensalada; Salero; Platillos; Tazón para servir; Fuente para servir; Otros
sk-SK: Kusy obedovej súpravy v cene: Misky; Miska na maslo; Poháre; Jedálenské taniere; Hrnčeky; Korenička; Šalátový tanier; Soľnička; Podšálky; Servírovacia miska; Servírovací tanier; Iné
fi: Mukana ruokailuastiat: Kulhot; Voiastia; Kupit; Ruokalautaset; Mukit; Pippurisirotin; Salaattilautanen; Suolasirotin; Asetit; Tarjoiluastia; Tarjoilulautanen; Muu
zh-CN: 包括餐具: 碗; 黄油碟; 杯子; 餐盘; 马克杯; 胡椒瓶; 沙拉盘; 盐瓶; 茶托; 上菜碗; 上菜盘; 其他
ru: Состав набора тарелок и мисок: Миски; Масленка; Чашки; Обеденные тарелки; Кружки; Перечница; Салатница; Солонка; Блюдца; Сервировочная миска; Сервировочное блюдо; Другое
th: ชิ้นส่วนอุปกรณ์สำหรับมื้ออาหารที่รวมอยู่: ชาม; ถ้วยใส่เนย; ถ้วย; จานอาหารคาว; ถ้วย; ขวดใส่พริกไทย; จานสลัด; ขวดเกลือ; จานรอง; ชามเสิร์ฟ; จานเสิร์ฟ; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Включени части от прибори за хранене: Купи; Чиния за масло; Чаши; Чинии за вечеря; Чаши тип „мъг“; Пиперник; Чиния за салата; Солница; Чинийки; Купа за сервиране; Плато за сервиране; Други
it: Stoviglie incluse: Recipienti; Burriera; Tazze; Piatti da tavola; Tazze; Pepiera; Piatto di insalata; Saliera; Piattini; Ciotola da portata; Piatto da portata; Altro
hr-HR: Uključeni komadi posuđa za jelo: Zdjele; Posuda za maslac; Čaše; Tanjuri; Šalice; Paprenka; Tanjur za salatu; Soljenka; Tanjurići; Zdjela za posluživanje; Pladanj za posluživanje; Ostalo
zh-TW: 包括餐具套組: 碗; 奶油盤; 杯子; 餐盤; 馬克杯; 胡椒罐; 沙拉盤; 鹽罐; 茶碟; 麵包碗; 沙拉盤; 其他
nl: Inclusief borden: Kommen; Botervloot; Bekers; Dinerborden; Mokken; Peperstrooier; Saladebord; Zoutvaatje; Schoteltjes; Serveerschaal; Serveerschotel; Andere
pl: W zestawie elementy zastawy obiadowej: Miski; Naczynie na masło; Kubki; Talerze obiadowe; Kubki; Pieprzniczka; Talerz sałatkowy; Solniczka; Spodki; Miska do serwowania; Półmisek do serwowania; Inne
da: Spisestel medfølger: Skåle; Smørskål; Kopper; Middagstallerkener; Krus; Peberbøsse; Salattallerken; Saltbøsse; Underkopper; Serveringsskål; Serveringsfad; Andet
sv: Matservis ingår: Skålar; Smörfat; Koppar; Middagstallrikar; Muggar; Pepparströare; Salladstallrik; Saltströare; Fat; Serveringsskål; Serveringsfat; Övrigt
ja: 食器類の内容: ボウル; バター皿; カップ; ディナープレート; マグカップ; こしょうシェーカー; サラダプレート; 塩シェイカー; ソーサー; ボウル; オードブル皿; その他
sl-SI: Priloženi deli jedilnega kompleta: Sklede; Posoda za maslo; Skodelice; Jedilni krožniki; Skodelice; Poprnica; Solatni krožnik; Solnica; Krožniki; Servirna skleda; Servirni krožnik; Drugo